Hawaii statutes.
[§302A-443.5] Education of students with
disabilities; private residential facilities; special education schools or
programs; accreditation. (a) As used in this section:

"Accredited private special education
school or program" means a private day school, private day program, or any
preschool that has earned accreditation according to the requirements and
procedures specified by the Western Association of Schools and Colleges, any
Hawaii affiliate of the Western Association of Schools and Colleges, the Hawaii
Association of Independent Schools, the National Association for the Education
of Young Children, or the National Early Childhood Program for Accreditation.

"Certified or licensed private residential
facility" means a private residential school or program that has earned
licensure, certification, or accreditation according to requirements and
procedures specified by the appropriate state licensure board or department.

"Nonpublic special education school or
program" means any privately owned or operated preschool, school,
educational organization or corporation, treatment facility, day program,
residential program, or any other placement that maintains, conducts, or
provides classes or programming, including related services as defined by
federal or state laws, rules, or regulations, for the purpose of offering
instruction or treatment to students with disabilities for consideration,
profit, tuition, or fees.

(b) Any accredited private special education
school or program, certified or licensed private residential facility, or
nonpublic special education school or program that:

(1) Provides education, treatment, programming, or
related services to students with disabilities who are eligible to receive
special education and related services pursuant to federal or state laws,
rules, or regulations; and

(2) Receives funding from the State, either directly
or through parental reimbursement,

shall comply with all federal and state laws, rules,
and regulations.

(c) Any nonpublic special education school or
program that:

(1) Is not accredited by the Western Association of
Schools and Colleges, any Hawaii affiliate of the Western Association of
Schools and Colleges, the Hawaii Association of Independent Schools, the
National Association for the Education of Young Children, or the National Early
Childhood Program for Accreditation; and

(2) Receives funding from the State, either directly
or through parental reimbursement,

shall apply for accreditation within ninety days
from the date of accepting a student with disabilities who was placed there as
the result of a hearing officer's decision pursuant to section 302A-443, court
order, settlement agreement, or placement by the department. Within the
ninety-day application period, the nonpublic special education school or
program shall provide proof of its application for accreditation to the
department.

(d) The department may adopt rules pursuant to
chapter 91 to implement this section. [L 2011, c 128, §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next